tools/spellcheckers/test/fstbased/fstspeller-gt-norm-yamls/CmpN-tests_fstspeller-gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen:  ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/generator-fstspeller-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/analyser-fstspeller-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen:  ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/generator-fstspeller-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../tools/spellcheckers/fstbased/analyser-fstspeller-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Default tests: # Default in SMA is SgNom
    båaloe+N+Sem/Clthpart+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#raejkie+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: [ båaloe∑#raejkie]
    båaloe+N+Sem/Clthpart+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#raejkie+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: [~båaloen∑#raejkie]
    båaloe+N+Sem/Clthpart+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#raejkie+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: [~båaloej∑#raejkie]
    leevege+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#gåetie+N+Sem/Build+Sg+Nom: [leeveh∑#gåetie, ~leevege∑#gåetie]
    leevege+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#gåetie+N+Sem/Build+Sg+Nom: [~leevegen∑#gåetie]
    leevege+N+Sem/Dummytag+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#gåetie+N+Sem/Build+Sg+Nom: [~leevegi∑#gåetie]

# Explicit CmpN/SgNom tests:
  CmpN/SgN tests:
    vuelie+N+Sem/Prod-audio+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gåetie+N+Sem/Build+Sg+Nom: [ vuelie∑#gåetie]
    vuelie+N+Sem/Prod-audio+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#gåetie+N+Sem/Build+Sg+Nom: [~vuelien∑#gåetie]
    vuelie+N+Sem/Prod-audio+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#gåetie+N+Sem/Build+Sg+Nom: [~vueliej∑#gåetie, ~vööli∑#gåetie]
      
# CmpN/SgGen tests: # No cases in the lexicon with only CmpN/SgGen
  CmpN/SgG tests:
    fraanske+A+Cmp/Attr+Cmp#gïele+N+Sem/Lang_Tool+Sg+Nom: [fraanske∑#gïele, ~fraansk∑#gïele]

# CmpN/PlGen tests: # No cases in the lexicon with only CmpN/PlGen
#  CmpN/PlG tests:
#    gööth+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#jerkie+N+Sg+Nom: [ gåetiejerkie]
#    gööth+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#jerkie+N+Sg+Nom: [~gåetienjerkie]
#    gööth+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#jerkie+N+Sg+Nom: [ gööthjerkie]

# CmpN/SgNom + CmpN/SgGen tests:
# This is the default - no such cases found in the lexicon.

# CmpN/SgGen + CmpN/PlGen tests:
  CmpN/SgGen + CmpN/PlGen tests:
    gelliengïele+N+Sem/Lang+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#jerkie+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: [~gellien#gïele∑#jerkie, ~gellien-gïele∑#jerkie ]
    gelliengïele+N+Sem/Lang+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#jerkie+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: [gellien#gïelen∑#jerkie,  gellien-gïelen∑#jerkie]
    gelliengïele+N+Sem/Lang+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#jerkie+N+Sem/Dummytag+Sg+Nom: [gellien#gïeli∑#jerkie,   gellien-gïeli∑#jerkie ]

# CmpN/SgNom + CmpN/SgGen + CmpN/PlGen tests:
  CmpN/SgN + SgG + PlG tests:
    bovtse+N+Sem/Ani+Sg+Nom: [bovtse]
    baalka+N+Sem/Route+Sg+Nom: [baalka]
    bovtse+N+Sem/Ani+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#baalka+N+Sem/Route+Sg+Nom: [bovtse∑#baalka ]
    bovtse+N+Sem/Ani+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#baalka+N+Sem/Route+Sg+Nom: [bovtsen∑#baalka]
    bovtse+N+Sem/Ani+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#baalka+N+Sem/Route+Sg+Nom: [bovtsi∑#baalka ]

#  CmpN/SgNomLeft tests:
  CmpN/SgNomLeft tests:
    gåetie+N+Sem/Build+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#guaktah+N+Sem/Dummytag+Pl+Nom: [  gåetie∑#guaktah]
    gåetie+N+Sem/Build+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#guaktah+N+Sem/Dummytag+Pl+Nom: [~gåetien∑#guaktah]
    gåetie+N+Sem/Build+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#guaktah+N+Sem/Dummytag+Pl+Nom: [~gåetiej∑#guaktah]
    
#  CmpN/SgGenLeft tests: # there are no entries in the lexicon with only SgGenLeft

#  CmpN/PlGenLeft tests:
#    spaanske+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#gasska+N+Sg+Nom: [spaanskegïele, ~spaanskengïele, ~spaanskigïele]

#  CmpN/SgNomLeft and CmpN/PlGenLeft tests:
  CmpN/SgNomLeft and CmpN/PlGenLeft tests:
    gïele+N+Sem/Lang_Tool+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#gaske+N+Sem/Feat-measr_Plc+Sg+Nom: [  gïele∑#gaske] # gïele - all three, gaske: CmpN/SgNomLeft and CmpN/PlGenLeft . 
    gïele+N+Sem/Lang_Tool+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#gaske+N+Sem/Feat-measr_Plc+Sg+Nom: [~gïelen∑#gaske] # gïele - all three, gaske: CmpN/SgNomLeft and CmpN/PlGenLeft . 
    gïele+N+Sem/Lang_Tool+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#gaske+N+Sem/Feat-measr_Plc+Sg+Nom: [  gïeli∑#gaske] # gïele - all three, gaske: CmpN/SgNomLeft and CmpN/PlGenLeft . 

#  All three Left tests:
  CmpN/SgNomLeft SgGenLeft PlGenLeft tests:
    båaloe+N+Sem/Clthpart+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#aejkie+N+Sem/Time+Sg+Nom: [ båaloe∑#aejkie] # båaloe - default, aejkie: all three Left
    båaloe+N+Sem/Clthpart+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#aejkie+N+Sem/Time+Sg+Nom: [båaloen∑#aejkie] # båaloe - default, aejkie: all three Left
    båaloe+N+Sem/Clthpart+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#aejkie+N+Sem/Time+Sg+Nom: [båaloej∑#aejkie] # båaloe - default, aejkie: all three Left
